Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1602
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Political Subdivisions Self-Funding Benefits Act is to permit political subdivisions to provide employee benefits to employees and their dependents through self-funding by establishing, participating in, and administering employee benefit plans. It is also the purpose of the act to require political subdivisions using self-funding for employee benefit plans to meet certain requirements to protect the benefits of covered employees and covered dependents.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 2.